Massachusetts, session 194th, H699.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 95 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 29, the words "3 years" and inserting
in place thereof the word “year”.
SECTION 2. Section 95 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 30, the words "6 months" and
inserting in place thereof the words “60 days”.
SECTION 3. Section 95 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:—
The department, subject to appropriation, shall adopt rules to require that all public
school districts and commonwealth charter schools adopt a policy to identify and develop
of 2

partnerships with community organizations and agencies for referring students to health, mental
health, substance use and social support services.
of 2